Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1027.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 39, chapter 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 3, to read: ARTICLE 3. ELECTRONIC POSTING OF PUBLIC NOTICEs START_STATUTE39-231. Electronic posting of public notices; government website requirements; definition A. IF publication of a notice in a newspaper is required or authorized by law, notwithstanding any other law, the government entity that is responsible for publishing the notice may provide the notice by posting on the government entity's official website if all of the following apply: 1. The government entity's official website notice has the complete text of the notice and is posted in a section of the government entity's official website that is designated for public notices. 2. The home page on the government entity's official website has a prominently displayed link to the public notices section. 3. The notice remains on the government entity's official website for the entire period of time that publication would otherwise be required in a newspaper. B. In addition to posting the notice on the government entity's official website, THE government entity shall publish a reference advertisement in at least one newspaper that meets the requirements of section 39-204.  The reference advertisement must meet all of the following: 1. Not be smaller than six square column inches. 2. Have a heading that states the name of the government entity and the words "public notice". 3. List a short descriptive title of the public notice being published. 4. Provide a notice that the full text of the public notice may be viewed on the government entity's official website and include the website's internet address. 5. Include a telephone number a person may call to obtain information about the public notice or request a copy by mail or in person. 6. Be published pursuant to the requirements prescribed in section 39-204. C. A public notice that complies with this section is deemed to be published in compliance with all statutory and regulatory requirements for publication in a newspaper of general circulation and has the same legal force and effect. D. A government entity that posts a public notice pursuant to this section shall maintain an electronic record or certificate of posting in PERPETUITY that identifies the date and duration of the website posting. E. For the purposes of this section, "government entity" means any department, agency, board, commission, authority or political subdivision of this state and any county, city, town or district that is required or authorized to issue a public notice. END_STATUTE